Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1260] Industrial hemp. [Section
repealed June 30, 2021. L 2016, c 228, §8.] The possession, cultivation,
sale, receipt, or transfer of industrial hemp as authorized under part II of
chapter 141 shall not constitute an offense under this part. [L 2016, c 228,
§4]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1260

Act 228, Session Laws 2016, added this section to exempt the
possession, cultivation, sale, receipt, or transfer of industrial hemp in
accordance with the industrial hemp pilot program established by Act 228 from
acts constituting offenses related to drugs and intoxicating compounds. The
legislature found that industrial hemp is well suited to Hawaii's climate and
soil and can grow to over ten feet in a short period of time with little water
and no pesticides. According to estimates by the Hemp Industries Association,
retail sales of industrial hemp products grew to over $620,000,000 annually in
2014. Industrial hemp has over 25,000 uses, including food, fiber, and fuel
products, and has high potential to contribute to the future viability of the
State's agricultural industry. Conference Committee Report No. 88-16, House
Standing Committee Report No. 1272-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next